Illinois, session 104th, SB2063.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the OB-GYN 5Malpractice Premium Adjustment Law. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 7changing Section 155.18 and by adding Section 155.18b as 8follows: 9    (215 ILCS 5/155.18)  (from Ch. 73, par. 767.18)10    Sec. 155.18. (a) This Section shall apply to insurance on 11risks based upon negligence by a physician, hospital or other 12health care provider, referred to herein as medical liability 13insurance. This Section shall not apply to contracts of 14reinsurance, nor to any farm, county, district or township 15mutual insurance company transacting business under an Act 16entitled "An Act relating to local mutual district, county and 17township insurance companies", approved March 13, 1936, as now 18or hereafter amended, nor to any such company operating under 19a special charter.20    To the extent that the provisions of this Section conflict 21with the provisions of Section 155.18b, the provisions of 22Section 155.18b control.   SB2063- 2 -LRB104 08937 BAB 18992 b1    (b) The following standards shall apply to the making and 2use of rates pertaining to all classes of medical liability 3insurance:4        (1) Rates shall not be excessive or inadequate, as 5    herein defined, nor shall they be unfairly discriminatory. 6    No rate shall be held to be excessive unless such rate is 7    unreasonably high for the insurance provided, and a 8    reasonable degree of competition does not exist in the 9    area with respect to the classification to which such rate 10    is applicable.11        No rate shall be held inadequate unless it is 12    unreasonably low for the insurance provided and continued 13    use of it would endanger solvency of the company.14        (2) Consideration shall be given, to the extent 15    applicable, to past and prospective loss experience within 16    and outside this State, to a reasonable margin for 17    underwriting profit and contingencies, to past and 18    prospective expenses both countrywide and those especially 19    applicable to this State, and to all other factors, 20    including judgment factors, deemed relevant within and 21    outside this State.22        Consideration may also be given in the making and use 23    of rates to dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium 24    deposits allowed or returned by companies to their 25    policyholders, members or subscribers.26        (3) The systems of expense provisions included in the   SB2063- 3 -LRB104 08937 BAB 18992 b1    rates for use by any company or group of companies may 2    differ from those of other companies or groups of 3    companies to reflect the operating methods of any such 4    company or group with respect to any kind of insurance, or 5    with respect to any subdivision or combination thereof.6        (4) Risks may be grouped by classifications for the 7    establishment of rates and minimum premiums. 8    Classification rates may be modified to produce rates for 9    individual risks in accordance with rating plans which 10    establish standards for measuring variations in hazards or 11    expense provisions, or both. Such standards may measure 12    any difference among risks that have a probable effect 13    upon losses or expenses. Such classifications or 14    modifications of classifications of risks may be 15    established based upon size, expense, management, 16    individual experience, location or dispersion of hazard, 17    or any other reasonable considerations and shall apply to 18    all risks under the same or substantially the same 19    circumstances or conditions. The rate for an established 20    classification should be related generally to the 21    anticipated loss and expense factors of the class.22    (c) Every company writing medical liability insurance 23shall file with the Director of Insurance the rates and rating 24schedules it uses for medical liability insurance. 25         (1) This filing shall occur at least annually and as 26    often as the rates are changed or amended.  SB2063- 4 -LRB104 08937 BAB 18992 b1         (2) For the purposes of this Section any change in 2    premium to the company's insureds as a result of a change 3    in the company's base rates or a change in its increased 4    limits factors shall constitute a change in rates and 5    shall require a filing with the Director. 6     (3) It shall be certified in such filing by an officer of 7the company and a qualified actuary that the company's rates 8are based on sound actuarial principles and are not 9inconsistent with the company's experience. 10    (d) If after a hearing the Director finds:11        (1) that any rate, rating plan or rating system 12    violates the provisions of this Section applicable to it, 13    he may issue an order to the company which has been the 14    subject of the hearing specifying in what respects such 15    violation exists and stating when, within a reasonable 16    period of time, the further use of such rate or rating 17    system by such company in contracts of insurance made 18    thereafter shall be prohibited;19        (2) that the violation of any of the provisions of 20    this Section applicable to it by any company which has 21    been the subject of hearing was wilful, he may suspend or 22    revoke, in whole or in part, the certificate of authority 23    of such company with respect to the class of insurance 24    which has been the subject of the hearing.25(Source: P.A. 103-426, eff. 8-4-23.)   SB2063- 5 -LRB104 08937 BAB 18992 b1    (215 ILCS 5/155.18b new)2    Sec. 155.18b. Medical liability insurance for 3obstetricians and gynecologists.4    (a) The purpose of this Section is to ensure fair and 5equitable medical malpractice premiums for obstetricians and 6gynecologists (OB-GYNs) by requiring companies that issue 7medical liability insurance to consider reduced liability risk 8for OB-GYNs who do not perform childbirth or obstetric 9services.10    (b) As used in this Act:11    "Gynecologic services" means medical care or procedures 12related to female reproductive health, excluding obstetric 13services. 14    "OB-GYN" means a physician, as defined in the Medical 15Practice Act of 1987, who specializes in obstetric and 16gynecologic services.17    "Obstetric services" means any medical care, procedure, or 18treatment related to pregnancy, labor, delivery, and 19postpartum care.20    (c) Companies that issue medical liability insurance must 21evaluate premium rates based on the specific scope of practice 22of each insured OB-GYN, considering whether the OB-GYN: 23        (1) provides obstetric services, including childbirth; 24    or25        (2) limits the OB-GYN's practice to gynecologic 26    services only.  SB2063- 6 -LRB104 08937 BAB 18992 b1    (d) Companies that issue medical liability insurance must 2classify OB-GYNs who do not provide obstetric services as 3lower-risk providers for the purposes of determining premium 4rates.5    (e) The Department shall establish guidelines for 6companies that issue medical liability insurance to classify 7and adjust premiums based on the risk profiles of OB-GYNs.8    (f) To the extent that the provisions of this Section 9conflict with the provisions of Section 155.18, the provisions 10of this Section control.